dictsource/tvl_rules
.group a
       a        a

.group e
       e        e

.group i
       i        i

.group o
       o        o

.group u
       u        u

.group ā
       ā        'a:

.group ē
       ē        'e:

.group ī
       ī        'i:

.group ō
       ō        'o:

.group ū
       ū        'u:

.group ai
       ai       ai

.group ae
       ae       ae

.group ao
       ao       ao

.group au
       au       au

.group ei
       ei       ei

.group eu
       eu       eu

.group iu
       iu       iu

.group oi
       oi       oi

.group ou
       ou       ou

.group ui
       ui       ui

.group g
        g       g

.group h
       h        h

.group k
       k        k
       kk       k:

.group l
       l        l

.group m
       m        m

.group n
       n        n
       ng       N

.group p
       p        p
       pp       p:
       
.group s
        s       s
        
.group t
        t       t
        tt      t:
.group v
       v        v
